Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 32 COLORADO MINED LAND RECLAMATION ACT
34-32-115. Action by board - appeals.

Upon receipt of an application for a permit and all fees due from the operator, the board or the office shall set a date for the consideration of such application not more than ninety days after the date of filing. At that time, the board or the office shall approve or deny the application or, for good cause shown, refer the application for a hearing on the question of whether the permit should be granted.

Prior to the holding of any such hearing, the board or the office shall provide notice to any person previously filing a protest or petition for a hearing or statement in support of an application pursuant to section 34-32-114 and shall publish notice of the time, date, and location of the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the proposed mining operation once a week for two consecutive weeks immediately prior to the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted as a proceeding pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. A final decision on the application shall be made within one hundred twenty days after the receipt of the application. In the event of complex applications, serious unforeseen circumstances, or significant snow cover on the affected land that prevents a necessary on-site inspection, the board or the office may reasonably extend the maximum time sixty days. In the event of in situ leach mining operations, a final decision on the application will be made within two hundred forty days.

If action upon the application is not completed within the period specified in subsection (2) of this section, the permit shall be considered to be approved and shall be promptly issued upon presentation by the applicant of a financial warranty in the amount of two thousand dollars per acre affected or such other amount as determined by the board.

The board or the office shall grant a permit to an operator if the application complies with the requirements of this article. The board or the office shall not deny a permit if the operator demonstrates compliance with the following:

The application is complete and the performance and financial warranties have been provided.

The applicant has paid the required fee.

No part of the proposed mining operation, the reclamation program, or the proposed future use is or may be contrary to the laws or regulations of this state or the United States, including but not limited to all federal, state, and local permits, licenses, and approvals, as applicable to the specific operation.

The board may require a statement by the applicant identifying which permits, licenses, and approvals the applicant holds or will be seeking for the proposed mining and reclamation activities.

The mining operation will not adversely affect the stability of any significant, valuable, and permanent manmade structures located within two hundred feet of the affected land, except where there is an agreement between the operator and the persons having an interest in the structure that damage to the structure is to be compensated for by the operator.

Repealed.

The mining operation is not located upon lands:

Where mining operations are prohibited by law or regulation within the boundaries of units of the national park system, the national wildlife refuge system, the national system of trails, the national wilderness preservation system, the wild and scenic rivers system, or national recreation areas;

Which are within or without the boundaries of, and are owned, leased, or have been developed by, any recreational facility established pursuant to article 7 of title 29, C.R.S., unless otherwise authorized by the appropriate governing body or unless the operation will not create any surface disturbance therein;

Which are within the boundaries of, and are owned, leased, or have been developed by, any park and recreation district established pursuant to article 1 of title 32, C.R.S., unless otherwise authorized by the board of directors of the district or unless the operation will not create any surface disturbance therein; and

That are within the boundaries of any unit of the state park system or any state recreational area in which the entire fee estate is owned by the state of Colorado, unless the mining operation is approved jointly by the board, by the governor, and by the parks and wildlife commission, or unless the operation will not create any surface disturbance therein.

The proposed reclamation plan conforms to the requirements of section 34-32-116.

For designated mining operations, an environmental protection plan has been submitted and conforms to the requirements of sections 34-32-116 and 34-32-116.5.

The board or the office may deny a permit for in situ leach mining operations based on scientific or technical uncertainty about the feasibility of reclamation and shall deny such a permit if the applicant fails to demonstrate that reclamation can and will be accomplished in compliance with this article, including the protection of groundwater and other environmental resources and human health.

The board or the office shall deny a permit for in situ leach mining if the applicant fails to demonstrate by substantial evidence that it will reclaim all affected groundwater for all water quality parameters that are specifically identified in the baseline site characterization, or in the statewide radioactive materials standards or tables 1 through 4 of the basic standards for groundwater as established by the Colorado water quality control commission, to either of the following:

Premining baseline water quality or better, as established by the baseline site characterization conducted pursuant to section 34-32-112.5 (5); or

That quality which meets the statewide radioactive materials standards and the most stringent criteria set forth in tables 1 through 4 of the basic standards for groundwater as established by the Colorado water quality control commission.

The board or the office may deny a permit for in situ leach mining if the existing or reasonably foreseeable potential future uses for any potentially affected groundwater, whether classified or unclassified pursuant to section 25-8-203, C.R.S., include domestic or agricultural uses and the board determines the in situ leach mining will adversely affect the suitability of the groundwater for such uses.

The board or the office may deny or revoke a permit for in situ leach mining if:

The applicant, an affiliate, officer, or director of the applicant, the operator, or the claim holder has demonstrated a pattern of willful violations of the environmental protection requirements of this article, rules promulgated pursuant to this article, a permit issued pursuant to this article, or an analogous law, rule, or permit issued by another state or the United States as disclosed in the application pursuant to section 34-32-112 (2)(i);

Except as specified in sub-subparagraph (B) of this subparagraph (II), the applicant or any affiliate, officer, or director of the applicant has in the ten years prior to submission of the application violated the environmental protection requirements of this article, rules promulgated pursuant to this article, a permit issued pursuant to this article, or an analogous law, rule, or permit issued by another state or the United States as disclosed in the application pursuant to section 34-32-112 (2)(i).

The board or office may issue or reinstate a permit if the applicant submits proof that the violation referred to in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (II) has been corrected or may conditionally issue or reinstate a permit if the violation is in the process of being corrected to the satisfaction of the board or if the applicant submits proof that the applicant has filed and is presently pursuing a direct administrative or judicial appeal to contest the validity of the alleged violation. For purposes of this sub-subparagraph (B), a direct administrative or judicial appeal to contest the validity of the alleged violation shall not include an appeal of an applicant's relationship to an affiliate. If the violation is not successfully abated or if the violation is upheld on appeal, the board or office shall revoke or deny the conditional permit issued or reinstated pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (B).

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 737, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(3) and (4)(a) amended, p. 1670, § 8, effective June 19; (4)(f)(III) amended, p. 1627, § 39, effective July 1.

L. 88:

IP(4) and (4)(g) amended and (4)(e) repealed, pp. 1210, 1215, §§ 10, 16, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(1), (2), and IP(4) amended, p. 1421, § 4, effective May 6.

L. 92:

(1), (2), and IP(4) amended, p. 1942, § 40, effective July 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1182, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2) amended and (5) added, p. 939, § 6, effective May 20.

L. 2012:

(4)(f)(IV) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1234, § 87, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-117 as it existed prior to 1976.

34-32-116. Duties of operators - reclamation plans.

Every operator to whom a permit is issued pursuant to the provisions of this article shall perform such reclamation as is prescribed by the reclamation plan adopted pursuant to this section.

Reclamation plans shall be based upon provisions for, or satisfactory explanation of, all general requirements for the type of reclamation chosen. The details of the plan shall be appropriate to the type of reclamation designated by the operator and shall be based upon the advice of experienced and technically trained personnel.

On the anniversary date of the permit each year, the operator shall submit:

A map showing the extent of current disturbances to affected land; and

A report describing the affected land and the surrounding area, including:

Changes over the preceding year regarding any disturbances to the prevailing hydrologic balance;

Changes over the preceding year regarding any disturbances to the quality and quantity of water in surface and groundwater systems;

Reclamation accomplished to date and during the preceding year;

New disturbances that are anticipated to occur during the upcoming year; and

Reclamation that will be performed during the upcoming year.

All operators shall submit, in addition to the plan and map, an annual fee as specified in section 34-32-127 (2).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 91, p. 1435, § 9, effective July 1, 1991.)

For operators who have filed an application pursuant to section 34-32-110 (1), the operator shall submit an annual fee as specified in section 34-32-127 (2) and a map or sketch describing the acreage affected to date and the acreage reclaimed to date.

Reclamation plans and the implementation of reclamation plans must conform to the following general requirements:

Grading shall be carried on so as to create a final topography appropriate to the final land use selected in accordance with paragraph (j) of this subsection (7).

Earth dams shall be constructed, if necessary to impound water, if the formation of such impoundments will not interfere with mining operations, damage adjoining property, or conflict with water pollution laws, rules or regulations of the federal government or the state of Colorado, or any local government pollution ordinances.

Acid-forming or toxic-producing material that has been mined shall be handled in a manner that will protect the drainage system from pollution.

All refuse shall be disposed in a manner that will control unsightliness, or deleterious effects from such refuse.

In those areas where revegetation is part of the reclamation plan, land shall be revegetated in such a way as to establish a diverse, effective, and long-lasting vegetative cover that is capable of self-regeneration and at least equal in extent of cover to the natural vegetation of the surrounding area. Native species should receive first consideration, but introduced species may be used in the revegetation process when found desirable by the board.

Where it is necessary to remove overburden in order to mine the mineral, topsoil shall be removed from the affected land and segregated from other spoil. If such topsoil is not replaced on a backfill area within a time short enough to avoid deterioration of the topsoil, vegetative cover or other means shall be employed so that the topsoil is preserved from wind and water erosion, remains free of any contamination by other acid or toxic material, and is in a useable condition for sustaining vegetation when restored during reclamation. If, in the discretion of the board, such topsoil is of insufficient quantity or of poor quality for sustaining vegetation or if other strata can be shown to be more suitable for vegetation requirements, the operator shall remove, segregate, and preserve in a like manner such other strata which are best able to support vegetation.

Disturbances to the prevailing hydrologic balance of the affected land and of the surrounding area and to the quality and quantity of water in surface and groundwater systems both during and after the mining operation and during reclamation shall be minimized.

Except as specified in subsections (7)(g)(III) and (7)(g)(IV) of this section, a reclamation plan for a new or amended permit must demonstrate, by substantial evidence, a reasonably foreseeable end date for any water quality treatment necessary to ensure compliance with applicable water quality standards.

The board may approve a reclamation plan that lacks substantial evidence of a reasonably foreseeable end date for any necessary water quality treatment if the new or amended permit includes an environmental protection plan and reclamation plan adequate to ensure compliance with applicable water quality standards and upon making a written determination:

For an amended reclamation plan, except as provided in subsection (7)(g)(III)(B) of this section, that the water quality impacts that have occurred or are occurring for which no reasonably foreseeable end date for water quality treatment can be established were either unforeseen at the time of approval of the reclamation plan or existing at a mine site permitted before January 1, 2019; or

For a new or amended reclamation plan for a permit involving a site that was previously mined but was not permitted as of January 1, 2019, that existing water quality conditions do not meet applicable water quality standards and no reasonably foreseeable end date for water quality treatment can be established.

The board may approve a new reclamation plan that lacks substantial evidence of a reasonably foreseeable end date for any necessary water quality treatment if a permit application is submitted and the reclamation plan is limited to reclamation of already-mined ore or other waste materials, including mine drainage or runoff, as part of a cleanup.

Nothing in this subsection (7)(g) allows the operator to avoid compliance with other applicable statutory provisions governing well permits, augmentation requirements, and replacement plans.

Areas outside of the affected land shall be protected from slides or damage occurring during the mining operation and reclamation.

All surface areas of the affected land, including spoil piles, shall be stabilized and protected so as to effectively control erosion and attendant air and water pollution.

On all affected land, the operator in consultation with the landowner where possible, subject to the approval of the board, shall determine which parts of the affected land shall be reclaimed for forest, range, crop, horticultural, homesite, recreational, industrial, or other uses, including food, shelter, and ground cover for wildlife. Prior to approving any new reclamation plan or approving a change in any existing reclamation plan as provided in this section, the board shall confer with the local board of county commissioners and the board of supervisors of the conservation district if the mining operation is within the boundaries of a conservation district. Reclamation shall be required on all the affected land.

If the operator's choice of reclamation is forest planting, the operator may, with the approval of the office, select the type of trees to be planted. Planting methods and care of stock shall be governed by good planting practices. If the operator is unable to acquire sufficient planting stock of desired tree species from the state or elsewhere at a reasonable cost, the operator may defer planting until planting stock is available to plant such land as originally planned, or may select an alternate method of reclamation.

The operator shall construct fire lanes or access roads when necessary through the area to be planted. These lanes or roads shall be available for use by the planting crews and shall serve as a means of access for supervision and inspection of the planting work.

On lands owned by the operator, the operator may permit the public to use the same for recreational purposes, in accordance with the limited landowner liability law contained in article 41 of title 33, C.R.S., except in areas where such use is found by the operator to be hazardous or objectionable.

If the operator's choice of reclamation is for range, the affected land shall be restored to the satisfaction of the board to slopes commensurate with the proposed land use and shall not be too steep to be traversed by livestock. The legume seed shall be properly inoculated in all cases. The area may be seeded either by hand or power or by the aerial method. The species of grasses and legumes and the rates of seeding to be used per acre shall be determined primarily by recommendations from the agricultural experiment stations established pursuant to part 6 of article 31 of title 23 and experienced reclamation personnel of the operator after considering other research or successful experience with range seeding. No grazing shall be permitted on reclaimed land until the planting is firmly established. The board, in consultation with the landowner and the local conservation district, if any, shall determine when grazing may start.

If the operator's choice of reclamation is for agricultural or horticultural crops which normally require the use of farm equipment, the operator shall grade so that the area can be traversed with farm machinery. Preparation for seeding or planting, fertilization, and seeding or planting rates shall be governed by general agricultural and horticultural practices, except where research or experience in such operations differs with these practices.

If the operator's choice of reclamation is for the development of the affected land for homesite, recreational, industrial, or other uses, including food, shelter, and ground cover for wildlife, the basic minimum requirements necessary for such reclamation shall be agreed upon by the operator and the board.

All reclamation provided for in this section shall be carried to completion by the operator with all reasonable diligence and shall be conducted concurrently with mining operations to the extent practicable, taking into consideration the mine plan, mine safety, economics, the availability of equipment and material, and other site-specific conditions relevant and unique to the affected land and to the postmining land use. Upon termination of the entire mining operation and in accordance with the reclamation plan, each phase of final reclamation shall be completed within five years after the date on which the operator advises the board that such phase has commenced, unless such period is extended by the board pursuant to section 34-32-112 (7); except that:

No planting of any kind shall be required to be made on any affected land being used or proposed to be used by the operator for the deposit or disposal of refuse until after the cessation of operations productive of such refuse, or proposed for future mining, or within depressed haulage roads or final cuts while such roads or final cuts are being used or made, or where permanent pools or lakes have been formed.

No planting of any kind shall be required on any affected land so long as the chemical and physical characteristics of the surface and immediately underlying material of such affected land are toxic, deficient in plant nutrients, or composed of sand, gravel, shale, or stone to such an extent as to seriously inhibit plant growth and such condition cannot feasibly be remedied by chemical treatment, fertilization, replacement of overburden, or like measures. Where natural weathering and leaching of any of such affected land, over a period of ten years after commencement of reclamation, fails to remove the toxic and physical characteristics inhibitory to plant growth or if, at any time within such ten-year period, the board determines that any of such affected land is, and during the remainder of said ten-year period will be, unplantable, the operator's obligations under the provisions of this article with respect to such affected land may, with the approval of the board, be discharged by reclamation of an equal number of acres of land previously mined and owned by the operator not otherwise subject to reclamation under this article.

With the approval of the board and the owner of the land to be reclaimed, the operator may substitute land previously mined and owned by the operator not otherwise subject to reclamation under this article or, in the alternative, with the approval of the board and the owner of the land, reclamation of an equal number of acres of any lands previously mined but not owned by the operator if the operator has not previously abandoned unreclaimed mining lands. The board also has authority to grant, in the alternative, the reclamation of lesser or greater acreage so long as the cost of reclaiming such acreage is at least equivalent to the cost of reclaiming the original permit lands. If any area is so substituted, the operator shall submit a map of the substituted area, which map shall conform to all of the requirements with respect to other maps required by this article. Upon completion of reclamation of the substituted land, the operator shall be relieved of all obligations under this article with respect to the land for which substitution has been permitted.

Sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (III) shall not apply to uranium or in situ leach mining.

Reclamation may be completed in phases, and the five-year period may be applied separately to each phase as it is commenced during the life of the mine.

If affected land is owned by a legal entity other than any local, state, or federal entity, any buildings or any structures having significant historical value placed thereon during mining operations which are conducted in accordance with paragraph (j) of this subsection (7) may remain on the affected land at the option of the operator and landowner.

All uranium extraction operations using in situ leach mining or recovery methods, including any injection of any chemicals designed to mobilize uranium resources, shall reclaim all affected groundwater for all water quality parameters that are specifically identified in the baseline site characterization, or in the statewide radioactive materials standards or tables 1 through 4 of the basic standards for groundwater as established by the Colorado water quality control commission, to either of the following:

Premining baseline water quality or better as established by the baseline site characterization conducted pursuant to section 34-32-112.5 (5); or

That quality which meets the statewide radioactive materials standards and the most stringent criteria set forth in tables 1 through 4 of the basic standards for groundwater as established by the Colorado water quality control commission. In establishing, designing, and implementing a groundwater reclamation plan, the mine operator shall use best available technology.

Operators of in situ leach mining operations shall take all necessary steps to prevent and remediate any degradation of preexisting groundwater uses during the prospecting, development, extraction, and reclamation phases of the operation.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire article R&RE, p. 739, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1252, § 3, effective May 25.

L. 81:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1678, § 3, effective April 30.

L. 88:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1210, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(7)(g) amended, p. 1426, § 7, effective July 15.

L. 91:

IP(7)(q) amended, p. 1419, § 1, effective May 6; (4) amended, p. 1073, § 54, effective July 1; (4) to (6) amended, p. 1435, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 92:

(7)(k) amended, p. 1942, § 41, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(7)(j) and (7)(n) amended, p. 518, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

IP(7)(q) and (7)(q)(III) amended and (8) and (9) added, p. 940, § 7, effective May 20.

L. 2018:

(7)(n) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1717, § 70, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(3), IP(7), and (7)(g) amended, (HB 19-1113), ch. 73, p. 266, § 1, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 34-32-111 as it existed prior to 1976.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1989 act amending subsection (7)(g), see section 1 of chapter 314, Session Laws of Colorado 1989.

34-32-116.5. Environmental protection plan - designated mining operation - rules.

An environmental protection plan shall be required for all designated mining operations.

All nondesignated mining operations are exempt from this section.

Once adopted, the provisions of an environmental protection plan shall be enforceable by the board and by the office to the same extent as any other permit provision or condition.

The board shall promulgate rules pursuant to section 34-32-109 (5) to require a holder of an existing permit for a designated mining operation to submit a proposed environmental protection plan for approval by the office or board.

The plan and fees due pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be due by the date established by the board by rule.

If an existing permit contains the necessary elements of an environmental protection plan, the office or board may deem the existing permit to be adequate to comply with the environmental protection plan.

For any environmental protection plan submitted for an existing operation, the office shall determine whether the proposed environmental protection plan shall be considered a technical revision or an amendment, as defined by rule, or that no modification to the existing permit is necessary.

The board shall promulgate rules governing the form, content, and requirements of an environmental protection plan for any designated mining operation. In promulgating such rules, the board shall consider the economic reasonableness, the technical feasibility, and the level or degree of environmental concerns, as applicable.

All applicants for new permits shall contact the division of parks and wildlife for appropriate wildlife protection recommendations which shall be reviewed as part of the application process. If protecting wildlife is determined to be necessary by the board, the office may incorporate such wildlife protection recommendations into the new permit as a condition for such permit.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1183, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3)(b) amended, p. 2047, § 89, effective June 1.